Texas, session 892, HB90.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 4, Chapter 209 (H.B. 30), Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 4.  This Act takes effect January 1, 2028 [2026]. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution.  If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.